California statutes. Elections Code
 Secretary of State, but that would result in a voting system certified by the Secretary of State to comply with the California Voting System Standards. A voting system developed pursuant to this paragraph shall use only nonproprietary software and firmware with disclosed source code, except that it may use unmodified commercial off-the-shelf software and firmware, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 19209.

(3) (A) Manufacture of the minimum number of voting system units reasonably necessary for either of the following purposes:

(i) Testing and seeking certification or conditional approval for the voting system pursuant to Sections 19210 to 19214, inclusive.

(ii) Testing and demonstrating the capabilities of the voting system in a pilot program pursuant to paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (b) and subdivision (c) of Section 19209.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “voting system” includes a part of a voting system.

(4) If a county uses funding provided to it for the activities described in paragraph (2) or (3), and those activities do not result in a voting system certified by the Secretary of State to comply with the California Voting System Standards by July 1, 2023, the county shall return the state funding provided for those activities to the State. If the county does not return the funding by June 30, 2024, the State Controller shall withhold any payment to the county in an equivalent amount, as directed by the Department of Finance.

(5) Costs reasonably related to the administration of an election during the COVID-19 pandemic.

(e) A voting system purchased or leased by a county for which the county seeks reimbursement from the Secretary of State pursuant to this section and that does not require a voter to directly mark on the ballot must produce, at the time the voter votes the voter’s ballot or at the time the polls are closed, a paper version or representation of the voted ballot or of all of the ballots cast on a unit of the voting system. The paper version shall not be provided to the voter but shall be retained by elections officials for use during the 1 percent manual tally described in Section 15360, or any recount, audit, or contest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 20, Sec. 2.   (AB 100)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 20. ELECTION CAMPAIGNS [20000. - 20520.]



CHAPTER 1. Endorsements of Candidates [20000. - 20012.]

20000.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Truth in Endorsements Law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20001.

The Legislature hereby finds the following to be true:

(1) The major political parties have become an integral part of the American governmental system requiring regulation as to their structure, governing bodies, and functions by state government in the public interest.

(2) The Legislature has found it necessary and appropriate in the regulation of political parties to create and provide for the convening of state conventions, state central committees, and county central committees for parties qualified by law to participate in the direct primary election, by statute.

(3) Over the several years preceding the adoption of this section organizations of electors using as a part of their names the name of a political party qualified to participate in the direct primary election have endorsed candidates for nomination of that party for partisan office in the direct primary election and have publicized and promulgated the endorsements in a manner that has resulted in considerable public doubt and confusion as to whether the endorsements are those of a private group of citizens or of an official governing body of a political party.

(4) The voting public is entitled to protection by law from deception in political campaigns in the same manner and for the same reasons that it is entitled to protection from deception by advertisers of commercial products.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20006.

The superior court, in any case brought before it by any registered voter, may issue a temporary or permanent restraining order or injunction against the publication, printing, circulation, posting, broadcasting, or telecasting of any matter in violation of this chapter, and all cases of this nature shall be in a preferred position for purposes of trial and appeal, so as to assure the speedy disposition thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20007.

No candidate or committee in his or her behalf shall represent in connection with an election campaign, either orally or in campaign material, that the candidate has the support of a committee or organization that includes as part of its name the name or any variation upon the name of a qualified political party with which the candidate is not affiliated, together with the words “county committee,” “central committee,” “county,” or any other term that might tend to mislead the voters into believing that the candidate has the support of that party’s county central committee or state central committee, when that is not the case.

This section shall not be construed to prevent a candidate or committee from representing that the candidate has the support of a committee or group of voters affiliated with another political party, which committee or group is identified by the name of that party, where the name of the committee or group also includes the name of the candidate.

Any member of a county central committee or state central committee may commence an action in the superior court to enjoin misrepresentation by a candidate or committee in his or her behalf, in the manner prohibited by this section, to the effect that the candidate has the support of the state or county central committee involved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20008.

Any paid political advertisement that refers to an election or to any candidate for state or local elective office and that is contained in or distributed with a newspaper, shall bear on each surface or page thereof, in type or lettering at least half as large as the type or lettering of the advertisement or in 10-point roman type, whichever is larger, the words “Paid Political Advertisement.” The words shall be set apart from any other printed matter.

As used in this section “paid political advertisement” shall mean and shall be limited to, published statements paid for by advertisers for purposes of supporting or defeating any person who has filed for an elective state or local office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20009.

(a) Every simulated ballot or simulated county voter information guide shall bear on each surface or page thereof, in type or lettering at least half as large as the type or lettering of the statement or words or in 10-point roman type, whichever is larger, in a printed or drawn box and set apart from any other printed matter, the following statement: 
“NOTICE TO VOTERS 
“(Required by Law)

“This is not an official ballot or an official county voter information guide prepared by the county elections official or the Secretary of State.

“This is an unofficial, marked ballot
 prepared by ____ (insert name and address of the person or organization responsible for preparation thereof).”

This section shall not be construed as requiring this notice in any editorial or other statement appearing in a regularly published newspaper or magazine other than a paid political advertisement.

(b) A simulated ballot or simulated county voter information guide referred to in subdivision (a) shall not bear an official seal or the insignia of a public entity, and that seal or insignia shall not appear upon the envelope in which it is mailed or otherwise delivered.

(c) The superior court, in a case brought before it by a registered voter, may issue a temporary or permanent restraining order or injunction against the
 publication, printing, circulation, posting, or distribution of any matter in violation of this section, and all cases of this nature shall be in a preferred position for purposes of trial and appeal, so as to assure the speedy disposition of cases of this nature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 84.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

20010.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a person, committee, as defined in Section 82013 of the Government Code, or other entity shall not, within 60 days of an election at which a candidate for elective office will appear on the ballot, distribute, with actual malice, materially deceptive audio or visual media, as defined in subdivision (e), of the candidate with the intent to injure the candidate’s reputation or to deceive a voter into voting for or against the candidate.

(b) (1) The prohibition in subdivision (a) does not apply if the audio or visual media includes a disclosure stating: “This _____ has been manipulated.”

(2) The blank in the disclosure required by paragraph
 (1) shall be filled with whichever of the following terms most accurately describes the media:

(A) Image.

(B) Video.

(C) Audio.

(3) (A) For visual media, the text of the disclosure shall appear in a size that is easily readable by the average viewer and no smaller than the largest font size of other text appearing in the visual media. If the visual media does not include any other text, the disclosure shall appear in a size that is easily readable by the average viewer. For visual media that is video, the disclosure shall appear for the duration of the video.

(B) If the media consists of audio only, the disclosure shall be read in a clearly spoken manner and in a
 pitch that can be easily heard by the average listener, at the beginning of the audio, at the end of the audio, and, if the audio is greater than two minutes in length, interspersed within the audio at intervals of not greater than two minutes each.

(c) (1) A candidate for elective office whose voice or likeness appears in a materially deceptive audio or visual media distributed in violation of this section may seek injunctive or other equitable relief prohibiting the distribution of audio or visual media in violation of this section. An action under this paragraph shall be entitled to precedence in accordance with Section 35 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) A candidate for elective office whose voice or likeness appears in a materially deceptive audio or visual media distributed in violation of this section may bring an action for general or special
 damages against the person, committee, or other entity that distributed the materially deceptive audio or visual media. The court may also award a prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit or preclude a plaintiff from securing or recovering any other available remedy.

(3) In any civil action alleging a violation of this section, the plaintiff shall bear the burden of establishing the violation through clear and convincing evidence.

(d) (1) This section shall not be construed to alter or negate any rights, obligations, or immunities of an interactive service provider under Section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(2) This section does not apply to a radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite
 television operator, programmer, or producer, that broadcasts materially deceptive audio or visual media prohibited by this section as part of a bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, or on-the-spot coverage of bona fide news events, if the broadcast clearly acknowledges through content or a disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or read by the average listener or viewer, that there are questions about the authenticity of the materially deceptive audio or visual media.

(3) This section does not apply to a radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or satellite television operator, programmer, or producer, when it is paid to broadcast materially deceptive audio or visual media.

(4) This section does not apply to an internet website, or a regularly published newspaper, magazine, or other periodical of general circulation, including an
 internet or electronic publication, that routinely carries news and commentary of general interest, and that publishes materially deceptive audio or visual media prohibited by this section, if the publication clearly states that the materially deceptive audio or visual media does not accurately represent the speech or conduct of the candidate.

(5) This section does not apply to materially deceptive audio or visual media that constitutes satire or parody.

(e) As used in this section, “materially deceptive audio or visual media” means an image or an audio or video recording of a candidate’s appearance, speech, or conduct that has been intentionally manipulated in a manner such that both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The image or audio or video recording would falsely appear to a reasonable person to be
 authentic.

(2) The image or audio or video recording would cause a reasonable person to have a fundamentally different understanding or impression of the expressive content of the image or audio or video recording than that person would have if the person were hearing or seeing the unaltered, original version of the image or audio or video recording.

(f) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1,
 2027, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2027,
 deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 493, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 745, Sec. 3.   (AB 972)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See related later operative section as amended by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 745.)
-------------------------------------------

20010.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a person, firm, association, corporation, campaign committee, or organization shall not, with actual malice, produce, distribute, publish, or broadcast campaign material that contains (1) a picture or photograph of a person or persons into which the image of a candidate for public office is superimposed or (2) a picture or photograph of a candidate for public office into which the image of another person or persons is superimposed. “Campaign material” includes, but is not limited to, any printed matter, advertisement in a newspaper or other periodical, television commercial, or computer image. For purposes of this section, “actual malice” means the knowledge that the image of a person has been superimposed on a picture or photograph to create a false representation, or a reckless
 disregard of whether or not the image of a person has been superimposed on a picture or photograph to create a false representation.

(b) A person, firm, association, corporation, campaign committee, or organization may produce, distribute, publish, or broadcast campaign material that contains a picture or photograph prohibited by subdivision (a) only if each picture or photograph in the campaign material includes the following statement in the same point size type as the largest point size type used elsewhere in the campaign material: “This picture is not an accurate representation of fact.” The statement shall be immediately adjacent to each picture or photograph prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Any registered voter may seek a temporary restraining order and an injunction prohibiting the publication, distribution, or broadcasting of any campaign
 material in violation of this section. Upon filing a petition under this section, the plaintiff may obtain a temporary restraining order in accordance with Section 527 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) A candidate for public office whose likeness appears in a picture or photograph prohibited by subdivision (a) may bring a civil action against any person, firm, association, corporation, campaign committee, or organization that produced, distributed, published, or broadcast the picture or photograph prohibited by subdivision (a). The court may award damages in an amount equal to the cost of producing, distributing, publishing, or broadcasting the campaign material that violated this section, in addition to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(d) (1) This section does not apply to a holder of a license granted pursuant to the federal Communications Act of
 1934 (47 U.S.C. Sec. 151 et seq.) in the performance of the functions for which the license is granted.

(2) This section does not apply to the publisher or an employee of a newspaper, magazine, or other periodical that is published on a regular basis for any material published in that newspaper, magazine, or other periodical. For purposes of this subdivision, a “newspaper, magazine, or other periodical that is published on a regular basis” does not include any newspaper, magazine, or other periodical that has as its primary purpose the publication of campaign advertising or communication, as defined by Section 304.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 493, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 745, Sec. 4.   (AB 972)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20012.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) California has now experienced its first-ever artificial intelligence (AI) election, in which disinformation powered by generative AI can pollute our information ecosystems like never before. Voters often do not know what images, audio, or video they can trust.

(2) In a few clicks, using current technology, bad actors now have the power to create a false image of a candidate accepting a bribe, or a fake
 video of an elections official “caught on tape” saying that voting machines are not secure, or generate an artificial robocall in the Governor’s voice telling millions of Californians their voting site has changed.

(3) In the 2024 presidential elections, candidates and parties created and distributed deepfake images and audio and video content. These fake images or files can skew election results, even if they use older methods of distribution, such as mail, television, telephone, and text, and undermine trust in the ballot counting process.

(4) Federal and state law prohibits the impersonation of candidates for public office and state and federal officials.

(5) California has a compelling interest in ensuring that its elections
 are free and fair and that its electorate is informed.

(6) Voters begin to concentrate on elections, and information about candidates, in the weeks immediately before elections are held. This is a short timeframe in which disinformation can influence voters’ decisions and may not be corrected before voters cast their votes.

(7) In order to ensure California elections are free and fair, California must, for a limited time before and after elections, prevent the use of
 deepfakes and disinformation meant to prevent voters from voting and deceive voters based on fraudulent content. The provisions of this section are narrowly tailored to advance California’s compelling interest in protecting free and fair elections.

(8) The labeling information required by this bill is narrowly tailored to provide voters with factual information about the inauthenticity of particular images, audio, video, or text content in order to prevent voter deception.

(9) A voter’s opinion of a candidate may be irreparably tainted by a fabricated representation of a candidate or elected official saying or doing something they did not say or do. These false, negative impressions may exist indefinitely once posted on the internet and permanently damage a candidate or elected official’s reputation and even put their safety at risk.

(b) (1) A person, committee, or other entity shall not, during the time period set forth in subdivision (c), with malice, knowingly distribute an advertisement or other election communication containing materially deceptive content of any of the following:

(A) (i) A candidate for any federal, state, or local elected office in California portrayed as doing or saying something that the candidate did not do or say if the content would be material to a voter’s electoral decisions or to public confidence in an election’s process or outcome.

(ii) For purposes of clause (i), “candidate for any federal, state, or local elected office” includes any person running for the office of President of the United States or Vice President of the United States who seeks to or will appear on a ballot issued in California.

(B) An elections official portrayed as doing or saying something in connection with an election in California that the elections official did not do or say if the content is material to public confidence in an election’s process or outcome.

(C) An elected official portrayed as doing or saying something in connection with an election in California that the elected official did not do or say if the content would be material to a voter’s electoral decisions or to public confidence in an election’s process or outcome.

(D) A voting machine, ballot, voting site, or other property or equipment related to an election in California portrayed in a materially false way if the content is material to public confidence in an election’s process or outcome.

(2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), this section does not apply to a candidate portraying themselves as doing or saying something that the candidate did not do or say if the content includes the disclosure required by Section 84514 of the Government Code or a disclosure stating, in every language used in the
 media, “This ____ has been manipulated.” and complies with the following requirements:

(A) The blank in the disclosure shall be filled with whichever of the following terms most accurately describes the media:

(i) Image.

(ii) Audio.

(iii) Video.

(B) (i) For visual media, the text of the disclosure shall be in a color that contrasts with the background so as to be easily readable by the average viewer.

(ii) For visual media that is video, the disclosure shall appear for the duration of the video and shall be in
 standard Arial Regular type that is at least 4 percent of the height or width of the television or video display advertisement, whichever is less.

(iii) For visual print media that is designed to be individually distributed, including, but not limited to, mailers, flyers, and door hangers, the disclosure shall be in standard Arial Regular type that is at least 14 point.

(iv) For visual print media that is larger than those designed to be individually distributed, including, but not limited to, yard signs or billboards, the disclosure shall be in standard Arial Regular type with a total height of at least 5 percent of the height of the advertisement.

(v) For visual electronic media that is a graphic, image, animated graphic,
 or animated image, the disclosure shall be in standard Arial Regular type with a type size of at least 11 point.

(vi) For any other type of visual media, the disclosure shall be in standard Arial Regular type with a size that is easily readable by the average viewer.

(vii) The disclosure shall not have its type condensed or have the spacing between characters reduced to be narrower than a normal noncondensed standard Arial Regular type. 

(C) If the media consists of audio only, the disclosure shall be read in a clearly spoken manner and in a pitch that can be easily heard by the average listener, at the beginning of the audio, at the end of the audio, and, if the audio is greater than two minutes in length, interspersed within
 the audio at intervals of not greater than two minutes each.

(3) (A) A person, committee, or other entity shall not, during the time period set forth in subdivision (c), do either of the following:

(i) Remove any disclosure required by paragraph (2).

(ii) Knowingly republish any content subject to paragraph (2) without the required disclosure.

(B) A violation of subparagraph (A) is evidence of intent to knowingly distribute an advertisement or other election communication containing materially deceptive content, as prohibited by paragraph (1).

(c) The prohibition in
 subdivision (b) applies only during the following time periods:

(1) For individuals set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), 30 days before any election in California in which the candidate is running.

(2) For individuals set forth in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), 30
 days before any election in California.

(3) For people and items set forth in subparagraphs (B) and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), 30 days before any election in California through 38 days after the election, inclusive.

(d) (1) A depicted individual, candidate or committee participating in the election, or elections official may seek injunctive or other equitable relief prohibiting the
 distribution of the materially deceptive content in violation of this section. The court shall also award a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. An action under this paragraph shall be entitled to precedence in accordance with Section 35 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(2) (A) A depicted individual, candidate or committee participating in the election, or elections official may bring an action for general or special damages against the person, committee, or other entity that distributed or republished the materially deceptive content in violation of this section. The court shall also award a prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. This subdivision shall not be construed to limit or preclude a plaintiff from securing or recovering any other available remedy at law or equity.

(B) This paragraph does not apply to a broadcasting station or internet website that distributed the materially deceptive content if the broadcasting station or internet website did not create the content.

(3) In any civil action alleging a violation of this section, the plaintiff shall bear the burden of establishing the violation through clear and convincing evidence.

(e) (1) This section does not apply to a broadcasting station that broadcasts any materially deceptive content prohibited by this section as part of a bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, commentary of general interest, or on-the-spot coverage of bona fide news events, if the broadcast clearly acknowledges through
 content or a disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or read by the average listener or viewer, that the materially deceptive content does not accurately represent any actual event, occurrence, appearance, speech, or expressive conduct.

(2) This section does not apply to a broadcasting station when it is paid to broadcast materially deceptive content and either of the following circumstances exist:

(A) The broadcasting station can show that it has prohibition and disclaimer requirements that are consistent with the requirements in this section and that it has provided those prohibition and disclaimer requirements to each person or entity that purchased the advertisement.

(B) Federal law requires the
 broadcasting station to air advertisements from legally qualified candidates or prohibits the broadcasting station from censoring or altering the message.

(3) This section does not apply to a regularly published newspaper, magazine, or other periodical of general circulation, including an internet or electronic publication, that routinely carries news and commentary of general interest, and that publishes any materially deceptive content prohibited by this section, if the publication clearly states that the materially deceptive content does not accurately represent any actual event, occurrence, appearance, speech, or expressive conduct.

(4) This section does not apply to an advertisement or other election communication containing materially deceptive content if either of the following
 criteria is satisfied:

(A) A reasonable person would understand that the content was satire or parody.

(B) The materially deceptive content includes a disclosure stating “This ____ has been manipulated for purposes of satire or parody,” or substantially similar language, and the disclosure complies with the requirements set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). 

(5) This section does not impose liability on an interactive computer service, as defined in Section 230(f)(2) of Title 47 of the United States Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Advertisement” means any general or public communication that is authorized or paid for the purpose of supporting or opposing a candidate for elective office in California or a ballot measure that appears on a ballot issued in California and that is broadcast by or through television, radio, telephone, or text, distributed through the internet, or disseminated by print media, including billboards, video billboards or screens, and other similar types of advertising.

(2) “Broadcasting station” means a radio or television broadcasting station, including any of the following:

(i) Cable operator, programmer, or producer.

(ii) Streaming service operator, programmer, or producer.

(iii) Direct-to-home satellite television operator, programmer, or producer.

(3) “Committee” means a committee as defined in Section 82013 of the Government Code.

(4) “Deepfake” means audio or visual media that is digitally created or modified such that it would falsely appear to a reasonable person to be an authentic record of the actual speech or conduct of the individual depicted in the media.

(5) “Depicted individual” means an individual who is falsely represented in materially deceptive content. 

(6) “Election communication” means any general or public communication not covered under
 “advertisement” that is broadcast by or through television, radio, telephone, or text, distributed through the internet, or disseminated by print media, including billboards, video billboards or screens, and other similar types of communications, that concerns any of the following:

(A) A candidate for office or ballot measure.

(B) Voting or refraining from voting in an election.

(C) The canvass of the vote.

(7) “Elections official” means any of the following persons, but only in their capacity as a person charged with holding or conducting an election, conducting a canvass, assisting with the holding or conducting of an election or a canvass, or performing another
 duty related to administering the provisions of the Elections Code:

(i) An elections official as defined in Section 320.

(ii) The Secretary of State and their staff.

(iii) A temporary worker, poll worker, or member of a precinct board.

(iv) Any other person charged with holding or conducting an election, conducting a canvass, assisting with the holding or conducting of an election or a canvass, or performing another duty related to administering the provisions of the Elections Code.

(8) “Malice” means the person, committee, or other entity distributed the audio or visual media knowing the materially deceptive
 content was false or with a reckless disregard for the truth.

(9) (A) “Materially deceptive content” means audio or visual media that is intentionally digitally created or modified, which includes, but is not limited to, deepfakes, such that the content would falsely appear to a reasonable person to be an authentic record of the content depicted in the media.

(B) “Materially deceptive content” does not include any audio or visual media that contains only minor modifications that do not significantly change the perceived contents or meaning of the content. Minor changes include changes to brightness or contrast of images, removal of background noise in audio, and other minor changes that do not impact the content of the audio or visual media.

(10) “Recipient” includes a person who views, hears, or otherwise perceives an image or audio or video file that was initially distributed in violation of this section.

(g) The provisions of this section apply regardless of the language used in the advertisement or solicitation. If the language used is not English, the disclosure required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall appear in the language used in the advertisement or solicitation.

(h) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
 application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 333, Sec. 1.   (AB 502)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Political Corporations [20100. - 20100.]



  ARTICLE 1. Incorporation [20100. - 20100.]

20100.

If the name of a corporation includes all or part of the name of any person, together with either (a) all or part of the title of any elective office, (b) the date (by year or otherwise) of the election for any office, or (c) any other words or figures indicating the candidacy or nomination of that person for elective office, the Secretary of State shall not accept its articles of incorporation for filing unless there is first filed with him or her a statement signed and acknowledged by that person consenting to the use of his or her name.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Campaign Funds [20200. - 20203.]



  ARTICLE 1. Solicitation [20200. - 20203.]

20200.

As used in this article “person” includes a firm, association, corporation, campaign committee or organization.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20201.

It is unlawful for any person that includes in any part of its name the name of any political party that was qualified to participate in the last preceding primary election, to directly or indirectly solicit funds for any purpose whatsoever upon the representation either express or implied that the funds are being solicited for the use of that political party unless that person shall have previously obtained the written consent of one of the following: a member of the national committee from California or the majority of the members of the national committee if there are more than two national committee members from California, chairman of the state central committee, executive committee of the state central committee, or executive committee of the county central committee of the party whose name is being used in the county in which the solicitation is to be made. If the county central committee of the party in that county does not have an executive committee, the written consent of the chairman and secretary of that county central committee is sufficient.

All persons soliciting funds in accordance with this section shall be furnished with adequate credentials bearing the name of the solicitor and a copy of the written consent that bears the signature of the person authorizing the solicitation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20202.

It is unlawful for any person who solicits funds for the purpose of supporting or promoting any candidates or committees to include in any part of its name the name of that candidate or committee unless that person shall have previously obtained the authorization of the candidate or committee or the candidate’s or committee’s designated agent to use the candidate’s or committee’s name in the name of that person.

Authorization by a candidate or committee shall not be construed as rendering the person soliciting funds a controlled committee as defined by Section 82016 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

20203.

Any person who solicits or receives contributions on behalf of any candidate or committee for the purported and exclusive use of that committee or the candidate’s election campaign and who is not authorized by the candidate or committee or the candidate’s or committee’s designated agent to do so, shall include a notice in any fundraising communication, whether through any broadcasting station, newspaper, magazine, printed literature, direct mailing, or any other type of general public advertising, or through telephone or individual oral fundraising appeal, clearly and conspicuously stating that the person is not authorized by the candidate or committee and that the candidate or committee is not responsible for the actions of that person.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Fair Campaign Practices [20400. - 20444.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Intent [20400. - 20400.]

20400.

The Legislature declares that the purpose of this chapter is to encourage every candidate for public office in this state to subscribe to the Code of Fair Campaign Practices.

It is the ultimate intent of the Legislature that every candidate for public office in this state who subscribes to the Code of Fair Campaign Practices will follow the basic principles of decency, honesty, and fair play in order that, after vigorously contested, but fairly conducted campaigns, the citizens of this state may exercise their constitutional right to vote, free from dishonest and unethical practices which tend to prevent the full and free expression of the will of the voters.

The purpose in creating the Code of Fair Campaign Practices is to give voters guidelines in determining fair play and to encourage candidates to discuss issues instead of untruths or distortions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [20420. - 20420.]

20420.

As used in this chapter, “Code” means the Code of Fair Campaign Practices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Code of Fair Campaign Practices [20440. - 20444.]

20440.

At the time an individual is issued his or her declaration of candidacy, nomination papers, or any other paper evidencing an intention to be a candidate for public office, the elections official shall give the individual a blank form of the code and a copy of this chapter. The elections official shall inform each candidate for public office that subscription to the code is voluntary.

In the case of a committee making an independent expenditure, as defined in Section 82031 of the Government Code, the Secretary of State
 shall provide a blank form and a copy of this chapter to the individual filing, in accordance with Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code, an initial campaign statement on behalf of the committee.

The text of the code shall read, as follows: 
“CODE OF FAIR CAMPAIGN PRACTICES